Maine, session 132, LD1850.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 2 MRSA §9, sub-§8 is enacted to read:
8. Database of renewable energy construction projects. The office shall, in
coordination with state agencies that permit, enforce or provide state assistance regarding
renewable energy construction projects, including, but not limited to, the Department of
Environmental Protection, the Department of Labor, the Department of Agriculture,
Conservation and Forestry and the Public Utilities Commission, create and maintain a
database of renewable energy construction projects to identify renewable energy trends.
For purposes of this subsection, "renewable energy construction project" or "project" has
the same meaning as "assisted project" as defined in Title 26, section 1304, subsection 1-A
and "state assistance" means the provision of certifications or other economic assistance
described in Title 26, section 1304, subsection 1-A, paragraph B. For each renewable
energy construction project, the database must include:
A. The project's name;
B. The owner's name and contact information, including, but not limited to, the owner's
mailing address, telephone number and e-mail address;
C. The project's location, including, but not limited to, the physical address, including
the town and county, and latitude and longitude;
D. The project's nameplate capacity;
E. The anticipated date of start of construction of the project;
F. Whether the project is subject to the provisions of Title 26, chapter 43;
G. Whether the project is subject to the provisions of Title 26, section 1306-A or 3213;
H. The status of state assistance the project has applied for;
I. The status of permits the project has received or applied for; and
J. The status of any approval requested for the project under Title 38, section 484-C
or 484-D or Title 38, chapter 35.
By December 1, 2026 and annually thereafter, the office shall submit a report summarizing
renewable energy trends identified in the database to the joint standing committee of the
Legislature having jurisdiction over utilities and energy matters.